Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.265

Form for judgment against garnishee.

The judgment on garnishee's answer or tendered funds, and for costs against defendant, and the order to pay funds shall be substantially in the following form:

IN THE . . . . COURT OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR THE COUNTY OF . . . . .

. . . .

No. . . . . .

Plaintiff

vs.

judgment and order

to pay

(Clerk's Action Required)

. . . .

Defendant

. . . .

Garnishee

Judgment Summary

Judgment Creditor

. . . .

Garnishment Judgment Debtor

. . . .

Garnishment Judgment Amount

. . . .

Costs Judgment Debtor

. . . .

Costs Judgment Amount

. . . .

Judgments to bear interest at

. . . .

%

Attorney for Judgment Creditor

. . . .

IT APPEARING THAT garnishee was indebted to defendant in the nonexempt amount of $ . . . . . .; that at the time the writ of garnishment was issued defendant was employed by or maintained a financial institution account with garnishee, or garnishee had in its possession or control funds, personal property, or effects of defendant; and that plaintiff has incurred recoverable costs and attorney fees of $. . . .; now, therefore, it is hereby

ORDERED, ADJUDGED, AND DECREED that plaintiff is awarded judgment against garnishee in the amount of $. . . .; that plaintiff is awarded judgment against defendant in the amount of $ . . . . . . for recoverable costs; that, if this is a superior court order, garnishee shall pay its judgment amount to plaintiff [or to plaintiff's attorney] through the registry of the court, and the clerk of the court shall note receipt thereof and forthwith disburse such payment to plaintiff [or to plaintiff's attorney]; that, if this is a district court order, garnishee shall pay its judgment amount to plaintiff directly [or to plaintiff's attorney], and if any payment is received by the clerk of the court, the clerk shall forthwith disburse such payment to plaintiff [or to plaintiff's attorney]. Garnishee is advised that the failure to pay its judgment amount may result in execution of the judgment, including garnishment.

DONE IN OPEN COURT this . . . . . . day of . . . ., 20. .

. . . .

Judge/Court Commissioner

Presented by:

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff

[ 2003 c 222 s 11; 2000 c 72 s 6.]